Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2018.04
Inheritance tax; proceedings for determination of; deductions allowed; enumerated.

In all proceedings for the determination of inheritance tax, the following deductions from the value of the property subject to Nebraska inheritance taxation shall be allowed to the extent paid from, chargeable to, paid, payable, or expected to become payable with respect to property subject to Nebraska inheritance taxation:

(1) The cost of the funeral of the decedent, including costs for interment and gravesite marker;

(2) All expenses of administration which accrue as a result of the death of the decedent, including, but not limited to, attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses concerning property not subject to probate, and expenses related to taking possession or control of estate assets and the management, protection, and preservation of estate assets, including, but not limited to, expenses related to the sale of estate assets, but not expenses related to the day-to-day operation and continuation of business interests which have not accrued as a result of the death of the decedent;

(3) All expenses of the last illness of the decedent which were incurred within six months of the death of the decedent;

(4) All other debts upon which the decedent was liable for payment at the date of his or her death and which have been paid; and

(5) Any federal estate tax paid, payable, or expected to become payable, after deduction of all applicable credits, which is attributable to property subject to Nebraska inheritance taxation.

Laws 1976, LB 585, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 456, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 125, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB120, § 2.